Wyoming, session 2025, HB0019.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 40-32-101 and 40-32-102 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 32
SOCIAL MEDIA REGULATION

40-32-101. Definitions.

HB0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0182
(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Account holder" means a person who has or
who creates or opens an account or profile to use a social
media platform;

(ii) "Minor" means a person who is a resident of
Wyoming, who is under the age of eighteen (18) and who is
not married or has not become emancipated as provided in
W.S. 14-1-201 through 14-1-206;

(iii) "Social media company" means a person that
is an interactive computer service that provides a social
media platform for use;

(iv) "Social media platform" means an online
forum that a social media company makes available for an
account holder to create a profile, upload posts, view the
posts of other account holders or interact with other
account holders or users.

40-32-102. Social media platforms; parental consent
required; remedies.
HB0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0182

(a) No social media company shall allow a minor to be
an account holder on the social media company's social
media platform unless the social media company obtains the
express consent of the minor's parent or guardian.

(b) Each social media company shall deny access to
its social media platform for each account holder who fails
to meet the verification requirements specified in
subsection (a) of this section until the social media
company receives the express parental or guardian consent
required under subsection (a) of this section.

(c) The attorney general shall promulgate all rules
for:

(i) The process by which a social media company
can obtain parental consent for a minor seeking to open or
create an account and be an account holder on a social
media platform;

(ii) The method by which a parent or guardian of
a minor can provide consent for a minor to open or create
HB0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0182
an account and be an account holder on a social media
platform;

(iii) The methods by which social media
companies shall verify the authenticity of the parental or
guardian consent provided for a minor to open or create an
account and be an account holder on a social media
platform;

(iv) The methods by which a social media company
shall allow parents or guardians to revoke or withdraw
consent previously given for a minor to open or create an
account and be an account holder on a social media platform
and for parents or guardians to revoke or withdraw
nonconsent previously expressed and thereafter consent for
a minor to open or create an account and be an account
holder on a social media platform.

(d) The attorney general may pursue any remedy
authorized under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act
against a social media company that fails to comply with
this article.

HB0019

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0182
Section 2. The attorney general shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0019